Illinois, session 104th, SB3289.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The sum of $5,000,000, or so much thereof as may 5be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue Fund to 6the Department of Transportation for a grant to the 7Alexander-Cairo Port District for all costs associated with 8non-bondable development expenses of the Cairo Port. 9    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 102026.